Tennessee, session 114, HB0892.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 43-1-503, is amended by adding the
following after the last sentence of the section:
The department shall make the reports required under this section available in a publicly
accessible location on the department's website within one (1) month from the date the
governor approves the reports.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0892
002247
- 1 -